Utah statutes.
23-22-1.   Cooperative agreements and programs authorized.

(1)  The Division of Wildlife Resources  may enter into cooperative agreements and programs with other state agencies, federal agencies, states, educational institutions, municipalities, counties, corporations, organized clubs, landowners, associations, and individuals for purposes of wildlife conservation.

(2)  Cooperative agreements that are policy in nature shall be:

(a)  approved by the executive director of the Department of Natural Resources; and

(b)  reviewed by the Wildlife Board.

